Tennessee, session 114, HB2360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-1025(f), is amended by adding
the following immediately after the first sentence:
Thirty percent (30%) of the revenue from taxes on vapor products collected under this
part must be deposited with the state treasurer to be allocated among the counties in
equal amounts to be used for youth nicotine prevention programs and services.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2360
010938
- 1 -